Hawaii statutes.
§431:6-302 Corporate obligations. An
insurer may invest any of its funds in obligations other than those eligible
for investment under section 431:6-306 if they are:

(1) Issued, assumed, or guaranteed by any solvent
institution created or existing under the laws of the United States or of any
state, or district thereof; and

(2) Filed with the SVO or are considered "filing
exempt" by the Purposes and Procedures Manual of the SVO, or its successor
publication. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2; am L 2008, c 142, §5]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next